District of Columbia statutes.
31-3253

Penalties.

The Commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed $500 against any health insurer for each violation of this subchapter by the health insurer or its credentialing intermediary.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-96, § 103, 49 DCR 991

History